Utah statutes.
17-53-306.   Warrants -- Required information -- Payment -- Registration.
(1)  Each warrant drawn by order of the county executive on the county
treasurer for current expenses during each year shall specify the liability
for which it is drawn, when it accrued, and the funds from which it is to be
paid.
(2)  Each warrant shall be paid in the order of presentation to the treasurer.
(3)  If the money in the treasury is insufficient to pay a warrant, the
treasurer shall register the warrant and pay it in the order of registration.
(4)  Accounts for county charges of every description shall be presented to
the auditor and county executive to be audited as prescribed in statute.
